Hawaii, session 2025, GM1373.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII;
1 SECTION 1. The legislature finds that one of the most
2 popular traditional dishes to eat in the State is laulau.
3 Laulau is made from pork or fish wrapped in kalo and ti leaves
4 and then steamed, traditionally in an underground oven known as
5 an imu. The preparation and consumption of laulau are cherished
6 practices in Hawaiian communities, often shared at family
7 gatherings, celebrations, and feasts, serving as a symbol of
8 unity and cultural pride.
9 The legislature further finds that the preservation and
10 promotion of Hawaiian food traditions are essential to honoring
11 the rich legacy of Native Hawaiian culture and fostering a
12 deeper understanding of the cultural practices that have been
13 passed down through generations. The designation of "Laulau
14 Day" will provide an opportunity to celebrate and recognize this
15 iconic dish, raise awareness of its cultural significance, and
16 support local farmers, chefs, and communities who continue to
17 keep these traditions alive.
2025-3291 HB957 CDl HMSO
iniiiiiiiiiiiiniiiiiiniii

Page 2 H.B. NO.
I . . 'I
g- g1
C.D. 1
1 Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to designate the
2 first Friday in May of each year as "Laulau Day" in the State.
3 SECTION 2. Chapter 8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended
4 by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to
5 read as follows:
6 "§8- Laulau Day. The first Friday in May of each year
7 shall be known and designated as "Laulau Day". This day is not
8 and shall not be construed to be a state holiday."
9 SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
10 SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-3291 HB957 CDl HMSO 2
iiiiiHiiimiiniiini

957
H.B. NO.
:nwo
b
o
b
APPROVED this 2nd day of July , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 957, HD 1, SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 957, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
32